Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.130

Secretary of state's revolving fund—Publication fees authorized, disposition.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

There is created within the state treasury a revolving fund, to be known as the "secretary of state's revolving fund," which must be used by the office of the secretary of state to defray the costs of providing registration and information services authorized by law by the office of the secretary of state, and any other cost of carrying out the functions of the secretary of state under Title 11, 18, 19, 23, 23B, 24, 25, 26, 30A, 30B, 42, 43, or 64 RCW.

The secretary of state is authorized to charge a fee for publications in an amount which will compensate for the costs of printing, reprinting, and distributing such printed matter. Fees recovered by the secretary of state under RCW 43.07.120(2), 19.09.305, 19.09.315, 19.09.440, 23.95.260(1) (a)(ii) and (iii) and (d), or 46.64.040, and such other moneys as are expressly designated for deposit in the secretary of state's revolving fund must be placed in the secretary of state's revolving fund.

During the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the secretary of state's revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the fund.

[ 2015 c 176 s 8102; 2010 1st sp.s. c 29 s 7; 2005 c 518 s 924; 1994 c 211 s 1311; 1991 c 72 s 54; 1989 c 307 s 40; 1982 c 35 s 188; 1973 1st ex.s. c 85 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 122 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—2010 1st sp.s. c 29: See note following RCW 24.06.450.

Effective date—2005 c 518: See note following RCW 28A.600.110.

Effective date—1994 c 211: See note following RCW 18.04.025.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.

Application—1989 c 307: See RCW 23.86.900.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.